Hawaii statutes.
§128D-38 Exempt positions.
There are established such positions as necessary to support the voluntary
response program and other voluntary activities pursuant to this chapter.
These positions shall be appointed by the director without regard to chapter
76. These positions shall be included in any benefit program generally
applicable to the officers and employees of the State. [L 1997, c
377, pt of §2; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am L 2005, c 133, §6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next